Connecticut, session 2026, SB00090.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-181i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
For the purposes of [sections 53a-181j to 53a-181l, inclusive] this
section, section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-40a, as
amended by this act, and sections 53a-181j to 53a-181l, inclusive, as
amended by this act, and sections 5 to 13, inclusive, of this act, and
sections 15 to 21, inclusive, of this act:
(1) "Disability" means [physical disability, mental disability or
intellectual disability] any of the following: Physical disability or
blindness, each as described in section 1-1f, "intellectual disability" as
defined in section 1-1g or mental disability as described in section 46a-
51;
(2) "Gender identity or expression" [means a person's gender-related
identity, appearance or behavior, whether or not that gender-related
identity, appearance or behavior is different from that traditionally
associated with the person's assigned sex at birth] has the same meaning
as provided in section 1-1n;

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
[(3) "Mental disability" means one or more mental disorders, as
defined in the most recent edition of the American Psychiatric
Association's "Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders";
(4) "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning as provided in
section 1-1g; and
(5) "Physical disability" means any chronic physical handicap,
infirmity or impairment, whether congenital or resulting from bodily
injury, organic processes or changes or from illness, including, but not
limited to, blindness, epilepsy, deafness or being hard of hearing or
reliance on a wheelchair or other remedial appliance or device]
(3) "Protected social category" means a person's actual or perceived
race, color, religion, ethnicity, disability, alienage, national origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, if sixty years of
age or older, or any combination thereof;
(4) "Race" includes ethnic traits historically associated with race,
including, but not limited to, hair texture and "protective hairstyles", as
defined in section 46a-51;
(5) "Religion" includes denomination, creed and any aspect of
religious observance and practice as well as belief;
(6) "Religiously affiliated community center" means real property
used for the provision of recreational, social or educational services that
is owned or leased by a nonprofit organization that holds such property
out as being affiliated with a religion;
(7) "Sex" includes pregnancy, child-bearing capacity, sterilization,
fertility or related medical conditions; and
(8) "Sexual orientation" has the same meaning as provided in section
46a-51.
Public Act No. 26-77 2 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
Sec. 2. Section 53a-181j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of [intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the
first degree] hate crime causing physical injury when such person
[maliciously, and] acts with specific intent to intimidate or harass
another person motivated in whole or in substantial part by [the actual
or perceived race, religion, ethnicity, disability, sex, sexual orientation
or gender identity or expression] any protected social category of such
other person [,] and intentionally causes physical injury to such other
person or [to a third] another person.
(b) [Intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the first degree] Hate
crime causing physical injury is a class C felony, for which the court
shall impose a fine of at least three thousand dollars. [of the fine
imposed]
(c) A minimum fine pursuant to this section may not be remitted or
the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on the record its
reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 3. Section 53a-181k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of [intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the
second degree] hate crime causing physical contact when such person
[maliciously, and] acts with specific intent to intimidate or harass
another person [or group of persons] motivated in whole or in
substantial part by [the actual or perceived race, religion, ethnicity,
disability, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression of
such other person or group of persons, does any of the following: (1)
Causes physical contact with such other person or group of persons, (2)
damages, destroys or defaces any real or personal property of such other
person or group of persons, or (3) threatens, by word or act, to do an act
Public Act No. 26-77 3 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, if there is
reasonable cause to believe that an act described in subdivision (1) or (2)
of this subsection will occur] any protected social category of such other
person and intentionally causes physical contact with such other person.
(b) [Intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the second degree] Hate
crime causing physical contact is a class D felony, for which the court
shall impose a fine of at least one thousand dollars. [of the fine imposed]
(c) A minimum fine pursuant to this section may not be remitted or
the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on the record its
reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 4. Section 53a-181l of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of [intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the
third degree] hate crime affecting property when such person [,] acts
with specific intent to intimidate or harass another person [or group of
persons] motivated in whole or in substantial part by [the actual or
perceived race, religion, ethnicity, disability, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity or expression] any protected social category of such
other person [or persons] and: (1) [Damages] Intentionally damages,
destroys or defaces any real or personal property of such other person,
or (2) [threatens, by word or act, to do an act described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection or advocates or urges another person to do an act
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, if there is reasonable
cause to believe that an act described in said subdivision will occur]
damages, destroys or defaces any real or personal property of a third
person.
(b) [Intimidation based on bigotry or bias in the third degree is] A
violation of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section is a class D
felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of at least one thousand
Public Act No. 26-77 4 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
dollars.
(c) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section is a
class E felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of at least one
thousand dollars. [of the fine imposed]
(d) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime affecting a house of religious worship when such person, having
no reasonable ground to believe that such person has a right to do so,
intentionally damages, destroys or defaces any house of religious
worship.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be a (1) class D
felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less than one
thousand dollars if property is damaged as a consequence of such
violation in an amount up to and including ten thousand dollars, or (2)
class C felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less than
three thousand dollars if the property damaged as a consequence of
such violation is in an amount in excess of ten thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by threat of physical contact when such person, with specific
intent to intimidate or harass another person motivated in whole or in
substantial part by any protected social category of such other person,
threatens, by word or act, to cause physical contact with such other
person, if there is reasonable cause to believe that such an act will occur.
Public Act No. 26-77 5 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(b) Hate crime by threat of physical contact is a class D felony, for
which the court shall impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by threat to property when such person, with specific intent to
intimidate or harass another person motivated in whole or in substantial
part by any protected social category of such other person threatens, by
word or act, to damage, destroy or deface any real or personal property
of (1) such other person, if there is reasonable cause to believe that such
an act will occur, or (2) a third person, if there is reasonable cause to
believe that such an act will occur.
(b) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section shall
be a class D felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less
than one thousand dollars.
(c) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall
be a class E felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less
than one thousand dollars.
(d) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by threatening of a house of religious worship or religiously
affiliated community center in the first degree if such person acts in
violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-61aa of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, with the intent to cause an
evacuation of a building or the grounds of a house of religious worship
or religiously affiliated community center, during operational hours or
Public Act No. 26-77 6 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
when a building or the grounds of such house of worship or community
center are being used for the provision of religious or community
services, or used for activities sponsored by such house of worship or
community center.
(b) Hate crime by threatening of a house of religious worship or
religiously affiliated community center in the first degree is a class C
felony.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by threatening of a house of religious worship or religiously
affiliated community center in the second degree if such person acts in
violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-62 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, and the person threatened
is in a building or on the grounds of a house of religious worship or
religiously affiliated community center, during operational hours or
when a building or the grounds of such house of worship or community
center are being used for the provision of religious or community
services, or used for activities sponsored by such house of worship or
community center.
(b) Hate crime by threatening of a house of religious worship or
religiously affiliated community center in the second degree is a class D
felony.
Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by advocacy or urging if such person, with specific intent to
intimidate or harass another person motivated in whole or in substantial
part by any protected social category of such other person, advocates or
urges another person to damage, destroy or deface any real or personal
property of a third person, if there is reasonable cause to believe that
such an act will occur.
(b) Hate crime by advocacy or urging is a class E felony, for which
Public Act No. 26-77 7 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
the court shall impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the prosecution
or punishment of any person pursuant to section 53a-8 of the general
statutes or section 53a-179a of the general statutes.
Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by deprivation of civil rights when such person subjects, or causes
to be subjected, any other person to the deprivation of any rights,
privileges or immunities, secured or protected by the Constitution or
laws of this state or of the United States, motivated in whole or in
substantial part by any protected social category of such other person or
another person.
(b) Hate crime by deprivation of civil rights is a (1) class A
misdemeanor, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less than
one thousand dollars, or (2) class E felony, for which the court shall
impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars if property is
damaged as a consequence of such violation in an amount in excess of
one thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 12. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by burning a cross if such person places a burning cross or a
simulation of a burning cross on any public property, or on any private
property without the written consent of the owner, and with intent to
intimidate or harass any other person.
Public Act No. 26-77 8 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(b) Hate crime by burning a cross is a (1) class A misdemeanor, for
which the court shall impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars,
or (2) class E felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less
than one thousand dollars if property is damaged as a consequence of
such violation in an amount in excess of one thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 13. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by noose if such person places a noose or a simulation of a noose
on any public property, or on any private property without the written
consent of the owner, and with intent to intimidate or harass any other
person motivated in whole or in substantial part by any protected social
category of such other person or another person.
(b) Hate crime by noose is a (1) class A misdemeanor, for which the
court shall impose a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, or (2)
class E felony, for which the court shall impose a fine of not less than
one thousand dollars if property is damaged as a consequence of such
violation in an amount in excess of one thousand dollars.
(c) A minimum fine imposed pursuant to this section may not be
remitted or the amount reduced by the court unless the court states on
the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
Sec. 14. Section 53-37 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[Any person who, by his] (a) A person is guilty of hate crime by
commercial advertisement if such person, by such person's
advertisement, ridicules or holds up to contempt any person [or class of
persons, on account of the creed, religion, color, denomination,
nationality or race of such person or class of persons, shall be guilty of]
Public Act No. 26-77 9 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
motivated in whole or in substantial part by any protected social
category of such other person.
(b) Hate crime by commercial advertisement is a class D
misdemeanor.
(c) For purposes of this section, "advertisement" only includes
commercial speech.
Sec. 15. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by discriminatory public accommodations practice if such person
acts with intent to intimidate or harass any other person motivated in
whole or in substantial part by any protected social category of such
other person or another person, in violation of any provision of section
46a-64 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 46a-81d of the
general statutes, as amended by this act.
(b) Hate crime by discriminatory public accommodations practice is
a class D misdemeanor.
Sec. 16. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by discriminatory housing practice if such person acts in violation
of any provision of section 46a-64c of the general statutes, as amended
by this act, or 46a-81e of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
(b) Hate crime by discriminatory housing practice is a class D
misdemeanor.
Sec. 17. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by false report if such person falsely reports an incident in
violation of subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of section 53a-180
of the general statutes, as amended by this act, with specific intent to
falsely report another person motivated in whole or in substantial part
by any protected social category of such other person.
Public Act No. 26-77 10 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(b) Hate crime by false report is a class C felony.
Sec. 18. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by false report to law enforcement if such person falsely reports
an incident to a law enforcement officer or agency in violation of
subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of section 53a-180c of the
general statutes, as amended by this act, with specific intent to falsely
report another person motivated in whole or in substantial part by any
protected social category of such other person.
(b) Hate crime by false report to law enforcement is a class E felony.
Sec. 19. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by false report resulting in serious physical injury or death if such
person acts in violation of section 17 or 18 of this act and such false
report described therein results in the serious physical injury or death
of another person.
(b) Hate crime by false report resulting in serious physical injury or
death is a class B felony.
Sec. 20. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by stalking if such person commits stalking in the second degree
as provided in section 53a-181d of the general statutes and intentionally
directs such conduct at the other person motivated in whole or in part
by any protected social category of such other person.
(b) Hate crime by stalking is a class D felony.
Sec. 21. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A person is guilty of hate
crime by misuse of emergency 9-1-1 system if such person misuses the
emergency 9-1-1 system in violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection (a) of section 53a-180d of the general statutes, as amended by
this act, with specific intent to make a false alarm or complaint or report
false information about another person motivated in whole or in
Public Act No. 26-77 11 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
substantial part by any protected social category of such other person.
(b) Hate crime by misuse of emergency 9-1-1 system is a class A
misdemeanor.
Sec. 22. Section 53a-40a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A persistent offender of hate crimes [involving bigotry or bias] is
a person who (1) stands convicted of a violation of section [46a-58] 53-
37, as amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-
181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or
section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, and
(2) has been, prior to the commission of the present crime, convicted of
a violation of section [46a-58] 53-37, as amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-
181j, as amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-
181l, as amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 17,
18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, or section 46a-58, as amended by this act, in
effect prior to October 1, 2026, or section 53a-181b in effect prior to
October 1, 2000.
(b) When any person has been found to be a persistent offender of
hate crimes, [involving bigotry or bias,] the court shall: (1) In lieu of
imposing the sentence authorized for the crime under section 53a-35a if
the crime is a felony, impose the sentence of imprisonment authorized
by said section for the next more serious degree of felony, or (2) in lieu
of imposing the sentence authorized for the crime under section 53a-36
if the crime is a misdemeanor, impose the sentence of imprisonment
authorized by said section for the next more serious degree of
misdemeanor, except that if the crime is a class A misdemeanor the
court shall impose the sentence of imprisonment for a class [D] E felony
as authorized by section 53a-35a.
Sec. 23. Subsection (d) of section 54-56e of the general statutes is
Public Act No. 26-77 12 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, any defendant
who enters such program shall pay to the court a participation fee of one
hundred dollars. Any defendant who enters such program shall agree
to the tolling of any statute of limitations with respect to such crime and
to a waiver of the right to a speedy trial. Any such defendant shall
appear in court and shall, under such conditions as the court shall order,
be released to the supervision of the Court Support Services Division,
except that, if a criminal docket for drug-dependent persons has been
established pursuant to section 51-181b in the judicial district, such
defendant may be transferred, under such conditions as the court shall
order, to the court handling such docket for supervision by such court.
If the defendant refuses to accept, or, having accepted, violates such
conditions, the defendant's case shall be brought to trial. The period of
such probation or supervision, or both, shall not exceed two years. If the
defendant has reached the age of sixteen years but has not reached the
age of eighteen years, the court may order that as a condition of such
probation the defendant be referred for services to a youth service
bureau established pursuant to section 10-19m, provided the court
finds, through an assessment by a youth service bureau or its designee,
that the defendant is in need of and likely to benefit from such services.
When determining any conditions of probation to order for a person
entering such program who was charged with a misdemeanor that did
not involve the use, attempted use or threatened use of physical force
against another person or a motor vehicle violation, the court shall
consider ordering the person to perform community service in the
community in which the offense or violation occurred. If the court
determines that community service is appropriate, such community
service may be implemented by a community court established in
accordance with section 51-181c if the offense or violation occurred
within the jurisdiction of a community court established by said section.
Public Act No. 26-77 13 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
If the defendant is charged with a violation of section [46a-58] 53-37, as
amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-181k,
as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or section 5,
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, the court may
order that as a condition of such probation the defendant participate in
a hate crimes diversion program as provided in subsection (e) of this
section. If a defendant is charged with a violation of section 53-247, the
court may order that as a condition of such probation the defendant
undergo psychiatric or psychological counseling or participate in an
animal cruelty prevention and education program provided such a
program exists and is available to the defendant.
Sec. 24. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Nothing in section 53-37
of the general statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181j of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181k of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, or 53a-181l of the general statutes, as amended by
this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of
this act, shall be construed to limit any right under chapter 814c of the
general statutes of any person claiming to be aggrieved by a
discriminatory practice, as described in chapter 814c of the general
statutes, to file a complaint with the Commission on Human Rights and
Opportunities or to bring any civil action as authorized by section 46a-
98a of the general statutes, section 46a-100 of the general statutes, or as
otherwise provided by law.
(b) Nothing in section 53-37 of the general statutes, as amended by
this act, 53a-181j of the general statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181k
of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15,
16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the
jurisdiction and powers of the Commission on Human Rights and
Opportunities and the Attorney General under chapter 814c of the
general statutes.
Public Act No. 26-77 14 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(c) Nothing in section 53-37 of the general statutes, as amended by
this act, 53a-181j of the general statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181k
of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15,
16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to affect the authority
of any court to order financial restitution pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 53a-28 of the general statutes for any victim of a violation of
section 53-37 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181j of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, 53a-181k of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act.
Sec. 25. Section 46a-58 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section for
any person to subject, or cause to be subjected, any other person to the
deprivation of any rights, privileges or immunities, secured or protected
by the Constitution or laws of this state or of the United States, on
account of religion, national origin, alienage, color, race, sex, gender
identity or expression, sexual orientation, blindness, mental disability,
physical disability, age, status as a veteran, status as a victim of domestic
violence, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of
trafficking in persons.
(b) Any person who intentionally desecrates any public property,
monument or structure, or any religious object, symbol or house of
religious worship, or any cemetery, or any private structure not owned
by such person, shall be in violation of subsection (a) of this section. For
the purposes of this subsection, "desecrate" means to mar, deface or
damage as a demonstration of irreverence or contempt.
Public Act No. 26-77 15 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(c) Any person who places a burning cross or a simulation thereof on
any public property, or on any private property without the written
consent of the owner, and with intent to intimidate or harass any other
person or group of persons, shall be in violation of subsection (a) of this
section.
(d) Any person who places a noose or a simulation thereof on any
public property, or on any private property without the written consent
of the owner, and with intent to intimidate or harass any other person
on account of religion, national origin, alienage, color, race, sex, gender
identity or expression, sexual orientation, blindness, mental disability,
physical disability, age, status as a veteran, status as a victim of domestic
violence, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of
trafficking in persons, shall be in violation of subsection (a) of this
section.
[(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, any
person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a
class A misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than one thousand
dollars, except that if property is damaged as a consequence of such
violation in an amount in excess of one thousand dollars, such person
shall be guilty of a class D felony and shall be fined not less than one
thousand dollars.
(2) Any person who violates the provisions of this section by
intentionally desecrating a house of religious worship (A) shall be guilty
of a class D felony and shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars
if property is damaged as a consequence of such violation in an amount
up to and including ten thousand dollars, and (B) shall be guilty of a
class C felony and shall be fined not less than three thousand dollars if
the property damaged as a consequence of such violation is in an
amount in excess of ten thousand dollars.
(3) The minimum amount of any fine imposed by the provisions of
Public Act No. 26-77 16 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
this section may not be remitted or reduced by the court unless the court
states on the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine.
(4) The court may order restitution for any victim of a violation of this
section pursuant to subsection (c) of section 53a-28.]
(e) Nothing in section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the meaning of any
discriminatory practice as described in this section.
Sec. 26. Section 46a-64 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section: (1)
To deny any person within the jurisdiction of this state full and equal
accommodations in any place of public accommodation, resort or
amusement because of race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex,
gender identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of
income, intellectual disability, mental disability, physical disability,
including, but not limited to, blindness or deafness, status as a veteran,
status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of sexual
assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons, of the applicant,
subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and
applicable alike to all persons; (2) to discriminate, segregate or separate
on account of race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender
identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of income,
intellectual disability, mental disability, learning disability, physical
disability, including, but not limited to, blindness or deafness, status as
a veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of
sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons; (3) for a
place of public accommodation, resort or amusement to restrict or limit
Public Act No. 26-77 17 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
the right of a mother to breast-feed her child; (4) for a place of public
accommodation, resort or amusement to refuse entry to a person with a
disability who is accompanied by a service animal; or (5) to deny any
person with a disability or any person training an animal as a service
animal to assist a person with a disability, accompanied by such service
animal, full and equal access to any place of public accommodation,
resort or amusement. Any person with a disability or any person
training an animal as a service animal may keep such service animal at
all times in such place of public accommodation, resort or amusement
at no extra charge, provided such service animal is in the direct custody
and control of such person. When it is not obvious what service an
animal provides, staff of a place of public accommodation, resort or
amusement may inquire of the owner or keeper whether such animal is
a service animal required because of a disability and what work or task
the animal has been trained to perform. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a business owner's ability to recover for damage caused to a
person or property by a service animal. For the purposes of this
subsection, "disability" and "service animal" have the same meanings as
provided in section 22-345 and "place of public accommodation, resort
or amusement" has the same meaning as provided in section 46a-44.
(b) (1) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
sex discrimination shall not apply to (A) the rental of sleeping
accommodations provided by associations and organizations which
rent all such sleeping accommodations on a temporary or permanent
basis for the exclusive use of persons of the same sex or (B) separate
bathrooms or locker rooms based on sex. (2) The provisions of this
section with respect to the prohibition of discrimination on the basis of
age shall not apply to minors or to special discount or other public or
private programs to assist persons sixty years of age and older. (3) The
provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
discrimination on the basis of physical disability shall not require any
person to modify his property in any way or provide a higher degree of
Public Act No. 26-77 18 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
care for a physically disabled person, including, but not limited to blind
or deaf persons, than for a person not physically disabled. (4) The
provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
discrimination on the basis of creed shall not apply to the practice of
granting preference in admission of residents into a nursing home as
defined in section 19a-490, if (A) the nursing home is owned, operated
by or affiliated with a religious organization, exempt from taxation for
federal income tax purposes and (B) the class of persons granted
preference in admission is consistent with the religious mission of the
nursing home. (5) The provisions of this section with respect to the
prohibition of discrimination on the basis of lawful source of income
shall not prohibit the denial of full and equal accommodations solely on
the basis of insufficient income.
[(c) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor.]
(c) Nothing in section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the meaning of any
discriminatory practice as described in this section.
Sec. 27. Section 46a-64c of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, or to
refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make
unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any person because of race, creed,
color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity or expression,
marital status, age, lawful source of income, familial status, status as a
Public Act No. 26-77 19 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of
sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons.
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services
or facilities in connection therewith, because of race, creed, color,
national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity or expression, marital
status, age, lawful source of income, familial status, status as a veteran,
status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in
persons.
(3) To make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or
published any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the
sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex,
gender identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of
income, familial status, learning disability, physical or mental disability,
status as a veteran, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a
victim of trafficking in persons, or an intention to make any such
preference, limitation or discrimination.
(4) (A) To represent to any person because of race, creed, color,
national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity or expression, marital
status, age, lawful source of income, familial status, learning disability,
physical or mental disability, status as a veteran, status as a victim of
sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons, that any
dwelling is not available for inspection, sale or rental when such
dwelling is in fact so available.
(B) It shall be a violation of this subdivision for any person to restrict
or attempt to restrict the choices of any buyer or renter to purchase or
rent a dwelling (i) to an area which is substantially populated, even if
less than a majority, by persons of the same protected class as the buyer
or renter, (ii) while such person is authorized to offer for sale or rent
Public Act No. 26-77 20 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
another dwelling which meets the housing criteria as expressed by the
buyer or renter to such person, and (iii) such other dwelling is in an area
which is not substantially populated by persons of the same protected
class as the buyer or renter. As used in this subdivision, "area" means
municipality, neighborhood or other geographic subdivision which
may include an apartment or condominium complex; and "protected
class" means race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender
identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of income,
familial status, learning disability, physical or mental disability, status
as a veteran, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of
trafficking in persons.
(5) For profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent
any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective
entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,
creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity or expression,
marital status, age, lawful source of income, familial status, learning
disability, physical or mental disability, status as a veteran, status as a
victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons.
(6) (A) To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make
unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a
learning disability or physical or mental disability of: (i) Such buyer or
renter; (ii) a person residing in or intending to reside in such dwelling
after it is so sold, rented, or made available; or (iii) any person associated
with such buyer or renter.
(B) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services
or facilities in connection with such dwelling, because of a learning
disability or physical or mental disability of: (i) Such person; or (ii) a
person residing in or intending to reside in such dwelling after it is so
sold, rented, or made available; or (iii) any person associated with such
person.
Public Act No. 26-77 21 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(C) For purposes of this subdivision, discrimination includes: (i) A
refusal to permit, at the expense of a person with a physical or mental
disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to
be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to
afford such person full enjoyment of the premises; except that, in the
case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so,
condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restore
the interior of the premises to the condition that existed before the
modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted; (ii) a refusal to make
reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices or services,
when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person
equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; (iii) in connection with
the design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings for the
first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct
those dwellings in such manner that they comply with the requirements
of Section 804(f) of the Fair Housing Act or the provisions of the state
building code as adopted pursuant to the provisions of sections 29-269
and 29-273, whichever requires greater accommodation. "Covered
multifamily dwellings" means buildings consisting of four or more units
if such buildings have one or more elevators, and ground floor units in
other buildings consisting of four or more units.
(7) For any person or other entity engaging in residential real-estate-
related transactions to discriminate against any person in making
available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of such a
transaction, because of race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex,
gender identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of
income, familial status, learning disability, physical or mental disability,
status as a veteran, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a
victim of trafficking in persons.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in
any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other
Public Act No. 26-77 22 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or
renting dwellings, or to discriminate against him in the terms or
conditions of such access, membership or participation, on account of
race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender identity or
expression, marital status, age, lawful source of income, familial status,
learning disability, physical or mental disability, status as a veteran,
status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in
persons.
(9) To coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the
exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his having exercised or
enjoyed, or on account of his having aided or encouraged any other
person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected
by this section.
(b) (1) The provisions of this section shall not apply to (A) the rental
of a room or rooms in a single-family dwelling unit if the owner actually
maintains and occupies part of such living quarters as his residence or
(B) a unit in a dwelling containing living quarters occupied or intended
to be occupied by no more than two families living independently of
each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies the other such
living quarters as his residence. (2) The provisions of this section with
respect to the prohibition of discrimination on the basis of marital status
shall not be construed to prohibit the denial of a dwelling to a man or a
woman who are both unrelated by blood and not married to each other.
(3) The provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
discrimination on the basis of age shall not apply to minors, to special
discount or other public or private programs to assist persons sixty
years of age and older or to housing for older persons as defined in
section 46a-64b, provided there is no discrimination on the basis of age
among older persons eligible for such housing. (4) The provisions of this
section with respect to the prohibition of discrimination on the basis of
familial status shall not apply to housing for older persons as defined in
Public Act No. 26-77 23 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
section 46a-64b or to a unit in a dwelling containing units for no more
than four families living independently of each other, if the owner of
such dwelling resides in one of the units. (5) The provisions of this
section with respect to the prohibition of discrimination on the basis of
lawful source of income shall not prohibit the denial of full and equal
accommodations solely on the basis of insufficient income. (6) The
provisions of this section with respect to the prohibition of
discrimination on the basis of sex shall not apply to the rental of sleeping
accommodations to the extent they utilize shared bathroom facilities
when such sleeping accommodations are provided by associations and
organizations which rent such sleeping accommodations on a
temporary or permanent basis for the exclusive use of persons of the
same sex based on considerations of privacy and modesty.
(c) Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable
state statute or municipal ordinance restricting the maximum number
of persons permitted to occupy a dwelling.
(d) Nothing in this section or section 46a-64b shall be construed to
invalidate or limit any state statute or municipal ordinance that requires
dwellings to be designed and constructed in a manner that affords
persons with physical or mental disabilities greater access than is
required by this section or section 46a-64b.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits a person engaged in the business
of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration
factors other than race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex,
gender identity or expression, marital status, age, lawful source of
income, familial status, learning disability, physical or mental disability,
status as a veteran, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a
victim of trafficking in persons.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, complaints
alleging a violation of this section shall be investigated within one
Public Act No. 26-77 24 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
hundred days of filing and a final administrative disposition shall be
made within one year of filing unless it is impracticable to do so. If the
Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities is unable to complete
its investigation or make a final administrative determination within
such time frames, it shall notify the complainant and the respondent in
writing of the reasons for not doing so.
[(g) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor.]
(g) Nothing in section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the meaning of any
discriminatory practice as described in this section.
Sec. 28. Section 46a-81d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section: (1)
To deny any person within the jurisdiction of this state full and equal
accommodations in any place of public accommodation, resort or
amusement because of such person's sexual orientation or civil union
status, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law
and applicable alike to all persons; or (2) to discriminate, segregate or
separate on account of sexual orientation or civil union status.
[(b) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor.]
(b) Nothing in section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the meaning of any
discriminatory practice as described in this section.
Public Act No. 26-77 25 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
Sec. 29. Section 46a-81e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, or to
refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make
unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any person because of sexual
orientation or civil union status.
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services
or facilities in connection therewith, because of sexual orientation or
civil union status.
(3) To make, print or publish, or cause to be made, printed or
published any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the
sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on sexual orientation or civil union status, or an
intention to make any such preference, limitation or discrimination.
(4) (A) To represent to any person because of sexual orientation or
civil union status, that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale
or rental when such dwelling is in fact so available. (B) It shall be a
violation of this subdivision for any person to restrict or attempt to
restrict the choices of any buyer or renter to purchase or rent a dwelling
(i) to an area which is substantially populated, even if less than a
majority, by persons of the same sexual orientation or civil union status
as the buyer or renter, (ii) while such person is authorized to offer for
sale or rent another dwelling which meets the housing criteria as
expressed by the buyer or renter to such person and (iii) such other
dwelling is in an area which is not substantially populated by persons
of the same sexual orientation or civil union status as the buyer or renter.
As used in this subdivision, "area" means municipality, neighborhood
Public Act No. 26-77 26 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
or other geographic subdivision which may include an apartment or
condominium complex.
(5) For profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent
any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective
entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular sexual
orientation or civil union status.
(6) For any person or other entity engaging in residential-real-estate-
related transactions to discriminate against any person in making
available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of such a
transaction, because of sexual orientation or civil union status.
(7) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in
any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other
service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or
renting dwellings, or to discriminate against him in the terms or
conditions of such access, membership or participation, on account of
sexual orientation or civil union status.
(8) To coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the
exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of his having exercised or
enjoyed, or on account of his having aided or encouraged any other
person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected
by this section.
(b) Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable
state statute or municipal ordinance restricting the maximum number
of persons permitted to occupy a dwelling.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a person engaged in the business
of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration
factors other than sexual orientation or civil union status.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, complaints
Public Act No. 26-77 27 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
alleging a violation of this section shall be investigated within one
hundred days of filing and a final administrative disposition shall be
made within one year of filing unless it is impracticable to do so. If the
Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities is unable to complete
its investigation or make a final administrative determination within
such time frames, it shall notify the complainant and the respondent in
writing of the reasons for not doing so.
[(e) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor.]
(e) Nothing in section 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, shall be construed to limit the meaning of any
discriminatory practice as described in this section.
Sec. 30. Section 53a-61aa of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of threatening in the first degree when such
person (1) (A) threatens to commit any crime involving the use of a
hazardous substance with the intent to terrorize another person, to
cause evacuation of a building, place of assembly or facility of public
transportation or otherwise to cause serious public inconvenience, or (B)
threatens to commit such crime in reckless disregard of the risk of
causing such terror, evacuation or inconvenience; (2) (A) threatens to
commit any crime of violence with the intent to cause evacuation of a
building, place of assembly or facility of public transportation or
otherwise to cause serious public inconvenience, or (B) threatens to
commit such crime in reckless disregard of the risk of causing such
evacuation or inconvenience; (3) commits threatening in the second
degree as provided in section 53a-62, as amended by this act, and in the
commission of such offense such person uses or is armed with and
Public Act No. 26-77 28 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
threatens the use of or displays or represents by such person's words or
conduct that such person possesses a pistol, revolver, shotgun, rifle,
machine gun or other firearm; or (4) violates subdivision (1) or (2) of this
subsection with the intent to cause an evacuation of a building or the
grounds of a (A) [house of religious worship, (B) religiously-affiliated
community center, (C)] public or nonpublic preschool, school or
institution of higher education, or [(D)] (B) day care center, as defined
in section 19a-87g, during operational, preschool, school or instructional
hours or when a building or the grounds of such [house of worship,
community center,] preschool, school, institution or day care center are
being used for the provision of religious or community services, or
[house of worship, community center,] preschool, school, institution or
day care center-sponsored activities. No person shall be found guilty of
threatening in the first degree under subdivision (3) of this subsection
and threatening in the second degree upon the same transaction but
such person may be charged and prosecuted for both such offenses
upon the same information.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "hazardous substance" means any
physical, chemical, biological or radiological substance or matter which,
because of its quantity, concentration or physical, chemical or infectious
characteristics, may cause or significantly contribute to an increase in
mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating
reversible illness, or pose a substantial present or potential hazard to
human health. [and "religiously-affiliated community center" means
real property used for the provision of recreational, social or educational
services that is owned or leased by a nonprofit organization that holds
such property out as being affiliated with an organized religion.]
(c) Threatening in the first degree is a class D felony, except that a
violation of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section is a class C
felony.
Sec. 31. Section 53a-62 of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-77 29 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of threatening in the second degree when: (1)
By physical threat, such person intentionally places or attempts to place
another person in fear of imminent serious physical injury, (2) (A) such
person threatens to commit any crime of violence with the intent to
terrorize another person, or (B) such person threatens to commit such
crime of violence in reckless disregard of the risk of causing such terror,
or (3) violates subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection and the person
threatened is in a building or on the grounds of a (A) [house of religious
worship, (B) religiously-affiliated community center, (C)] public or
nonpublic preschool, school or institution of higher education, or [(D)]
(B) day care center, as defined in section 19a-87g, during operational,
preschool, school or instructional hours or when a building or the
grounds of such [house of worship, community center,] preschool,
school, institution or day care center are being used for the provision of
religious or community services, or [house of worship, community
center,] preschool, school, institution or day care center-sponsored
activities.
[(b) For the purposes of this section, "religiously-affiliated
community center" has the same meaning as provided in section 53a-
61aa.]
[(c)] (b) Threatening in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor,
except that a violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section
is a class D felony.
Sec. 32. Section 53a-180 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of falsely reporting an incident in the first
degree when, knowing the information reported, conveyed or
circulated to be false or baseless, such person: (1) Initiates or circulates
Public Act No. 26-77 30 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
a false report or warning of an alleged occurrence or impending
occurrence of a fire, explosion, catastrophe or emergency under
circumstances in which it is likely that public alarm or inconvenience
will result; (2) reports, by word or action, to any official or quasi-official
agency or organization having the function of dealing with emergencies
involving danger to life or property, an alleged occurrence or
impending occurrence of a fire, explosion or other catastrophe or
emergency which did not in fact occur or does not in fact exist; or (3)
violates subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection with intent to cause a
large scale emergency response. [; or (4) violates subdivision (1), (2) or
(3) of this subsection with specific intent to falsely report another person
or group of persons because of the actual or perceived race, religion,
ethnicity, disability, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity or
expression of such other person or group of persons.] For purposes of
this section, "large scale emergency response" means an on-site response
to any such reported incident by five or more first responders, and "first
responder" means any peace officer or firefighter or any ambulance
driver, emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician or
paramedic, as those terms are defined in section 19a-175.
(b) Falsely reporting an incident in the first degree is a [(1)] class D
felony. [for a violation of subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of
this section, or (2) class C felony for a violation of subdivision (4) of
subsection (a) of this section.]
(c) In addition to any sentence imposed pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section, if (1) a person is convicted of an offense in violation of
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section that resulted in a large
scale emergency response, (2) any agency or department of the state or
political subdivision of the state requests financial restitution for costs
associated with such emergency response, and (3) the court finds that
the agency or department of the state or political subdivision of the state
incurred costs associated with such emergency response as a result of
Public Act No. 26-77 31 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
such offense, the court shall order the offender to make financial
restitution under terms that the court determines are appropriate. In
determining the appropriate terms of financial restitution, the court
shall consider: (A) The financial resources of the offender and the
burden restitution will place on other obligations of the offender; (B) the
offender's ability to pay based on installments or other conditions; (C)
the rehabilitative effect on the offender of the payment of restitution and
the method of payment; and (D) other circumstances, including the
financial burden and impact on the agency or department of the state or
political subdivision of the state, that the court determines make the
terms of restitution appropriate. If the court determines that the current
financial resources of the offender or the offender's current ability to pay
based on installments or other conditions are such that no appropriate
terms of restitution can be determined, the court may forego setting
such terms. The court shall articulate its findings on the record with
respect to each of the factors set forth in subparagraphs (A) to (D),
inclusive, of this subsection. Restitution ordered by the court pursuant
to this subsection shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for
actual expenses associated with such emergency response. Restitution
ordered by the court pursuant to this subsection shall be imposed or
directed by a written order of the court containing the amount of actual
expenses associated with such emergency response, as ascertained by
the court. The order of the court shall direct that a certified copy of the
order be delivered by certified mail to the agency or department of the
state or political subdivision of the state. Such order is enforceable in the
same manner as an order pursuant to subsection (c) of section 53a-28.
Sec. 33. Section 53a-180a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of falsely reporting an incident resulting in
serious physical injury or death when such person commits the crime of
(1) falsely reporting an incident in the first degree as provided in
Public Act No. 26-77 32 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of section 53a-180, as amended
by this act, or (2) falsely reporting an incident in the second degree as
provided in subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of section 53a-
180c, as amended by this act, [or (3) falsely reporting an incident in the
first degree as provided in subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section
53a-180 or falsely reporting an incident in the second degree as provided
in subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 53a-180c,] and such false
report described in subdivision (1) [,] or (2) [or (3)] of this subsection
results in the serious physical injury or death of another person.
(b) Falsely reporting an incident resulting in serious physical injury
or death is a [(1)] class C felony. [for a violation of subdivision (1) or (2)
of subsection (a) of this section, or (2) class B felony for a violation of
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section.]
Sec. 34. Section 53a-180c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of falsely reporting an incident in the second
degree when, knowing the information reported, conveyed or
circulated to be false or baseless, such person gratuitously reports to a
law enforcement officer or agency (1) the alleged occurrence of an
offense or incident which did not in fact occur, (2) an allegedly
impending occurrence of an offense or incident which in fact is not
about to occur, or (3) false information relating to an actual offense or
incident or to the alleged implication of some person therein. [, or (4)
violates subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of this subsection with specific intent
to falsely report another person or group of persons because of the
actual or perceived race, religion, ethnicity, disability, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity or expression of such other person or
group of persons.]
(b) Falsely reporting an incident in the second degree is a [(1)] class
A misdemeanor. [for a violation of subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of
Public Act No. 26-77 33 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
subsection (a) of this section, or (2) class E felony for a violation of
subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.]
Sec. 35. Section 53a-180d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of misuse of the emergency 9-1-1 system when
such person (1) dials or otherwise causes E 9-1-1 to be called for the
purpose of making a false alarm or complaint, or (2) purposely reports
false information which could result in the dispatch of emergency
services. [, or (3) violates subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection with
specific intent to make a false alarm or complaint or report false
information about another person or group of persons because of the
actual or perceived race, religion, ethnicity, disability, sex, sexual
orientation or gender identity or expression of such other person or
group of persons.]
(b) Misuse of the emergency 9-1-1 system is a [(1)] class B
misdemeanor. [for a violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a)
of this section, or (2) class A misdemeanor for a violation of subdivision
(3) of subsection (a) of this section.]
Sec. 36. Section 53a-181c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of stalking in the first degree when such person
commits stalking in the second degree as provided in section 53a-181d,
and (1) such person has previously been convicted of a violation of
section 53a-181d, (2) such conduct violates a court order in effect at the
time of the offense, or (3) such person is twenty-two years of age or older
and the other person is under sixteen years of age. [, or (4) such person
intentionally directs such conduct at the other person, in whole or in
part, because of the actual or perceived race, religion, ethnicity,
disability, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression of
Public Act No. 26-77 34 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
such other person.]
(b) Stalking in the first degree is a class D felony.
Sec. 37. Section 52-571c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person injured in person or property as a result of an act that
constitutes a violation of section 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-
181k or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or section 6, 7 or 10 of this act
may bring a civil action against the person who committed such act to
recover damages for such injury.
(b) In any civil action brought under this section in which the plaintiff
prevails, the court shall award treble damages and may, in its discretion,
award equitable relief and a reasonable attorney's fee.
(c) No action shall be brought under this section but within three
years from the date of the act complained of.
Sec. 38. Section 3-129f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Attorney General may investigate the facts and circumstances
concerning any alleged violation of section [53a-181j, 53a-181k or 53a-
181l] 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as amended by this act,
53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or
section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, and
in connection with such investigation, issue subpoenas and written
interrogatories in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided
in section 35-42. No information obtained pursuant to the provisions of
this subsection may be used in a criminal proceeding.
(b) If the Attorney General finds that a person has committed an act
that constitutes a violation of section [53a-181j, 53a-181k or 53a-181l] 53-
Public Act No. 26-77 35 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-181k,
as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or section 5,
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, the Attorney
General may bring a civil action in the superior court for the judicial
district in which such act occurred in the name of the state against such
person.
(c) In any such action, the Attorney General may obtain, for the
benefit of a person adversely affected by a violation of section [53a-181j,
53a-181k or 53a-181l] 53-37, as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act, any relief to which such person may be entitled
by law, including treble damages; a civil penalty not to exceed two
thousand five hundred dollars, per violation, provided such violation
has been established by clear and convincing evidence; and declaratory,
injunctive or equitable relief that the Attorney General determines is
necessary to vindicate the public's interests. Any civil penalty that is
received pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(d) Nothing in this section shall limit the right of a person adversely
affected by a violation of section [53a-181j, 53a-181k or 53a-181l] 53-37,
as amended by this act, 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-181k, as
amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or section 5, 6,
7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, to bring an
action under section 52-571c, as amended by this act, or any other law
that may entitle such person to relief, except that the Attorney General
shall not bring an action under the provisions of this section during the
pendency of a matter involving the same parties and the same alleged
facts and circumstances before the Commission on Human Rights and
Opportunities.
(e) Nothing in this section shall permit the Attorney General to assert
Public Act No. 26-77 36 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
any claim against a state agency or a state officer or state employee in
such officer's or employee's official capacity, regarding actions or
omissions of such state agency, state officer or state employee. If the
Attorney General determines that a state officer or state employee is not
entitled to indemnification under section 5-141d, the Attorney General
may, as it relates to such officer or employee, take any action authorized
under this section.
Sec. 39. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 29-7d of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(1) Shall seek to prevent and detect any criminal activity or suspected
criminal activity in the state that is a violation of section [46a-58,] 53-37,
as amended by this act, 53-37a, 53-37b, [or 53a-61aa, subdivision (3) of
subsection (a) of section 53a-62, subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of
section 53a-181c, or section 53a-181j, 53a-181k or 53a-181l] 53a-181j, as
amended by this act, 53a-181k, as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as
amended by this act, or section 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20 or 21 of this act;
Sec. 40. Subsection (a) of section 51-279f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There shall be a State-Wide Hate Crimes Advisory Council within
the Office of the Chief State's Attorney, for administrative purposes
only. Members of the council shall include (1) the following, or their
designees: The Chief State's Attorney; the Chief Public Defender; the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection; the
president of the Connecticut Bar Association; the president of the
George W. Crawford Black Bar Association; the president of the South
Asian Bar Association of Connecticut; the president of the Connecticut
Asian Pacific American Bar Association; the president of the
Public Act No. 26-77 37 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
Connecticut Hispanic Bar Association; the director of the Institute for
Municipal and Regional Policy at The University of Connecticut; and
the president of the Connecticut Police Chiefs Association; (2) the head
of the Hate Crimes Investigative Unit, established pursuant to
subsection (d) of section 29-4; and (3) no more than thirty appointed by
the Governor who are representatives of organizations committed to
decreasing hate crimes, improving diversity awareness or representing
the interests of groups within the state protected by sections [53a-181j to
53a-181l, inclusive] 53-37, as amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-40a, as
amended by this act, and sections 53a-181j to 53a-181l, inclusive, as
amended by this act, and sections 5 to 13, inclusive, and 15 to 21,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 41. Subsection (a) of section 17a-210d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) Wherever the words "the mentally retarded" are used in the
following general statutes, "persons with intellectual disability" or
"individuals with intellectual disability" shall be substituted in lieu
thereof; (2) wherever the words "mentally retarded", "mentally retarded
person" or "mentally retarded persons" are used in the following general
statutes, the words "intellectual disability", "person with intellectual
disability" or "persons with intellectual disability" shall be substituted
in lieu thereof; and (3) wherever the words "mental retardation" are used
in the following general statutes, the words "intellectual disability" shall
be substituted in lieu thereof: 4a-60, 4b-31, 8-2g, 8-3e, 9-159s, 10-91f, 17a-
593, 17a-594, 17a-596, 45a-598, 45a-669, 45a-672, 45a-676, 45a-677, 45a-
678, 45a-679, 45a-680, 45a-681, 45a-682, 45a-683, 46a-51, 46a-60, 46a-64,
as amended by this act, 46a-64b, 46a-66, 46a-70, 46a-71, 46a-72, 46a-73,
46a-75, 46a-76, 46b-84, 52-146o, 53a-46a [, 53a-181i] and 54-250.
Sec. 42. Subsection (c) of section 53a-13 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
Public Act No. 26-77 38 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
1, 2026):
(c) As used in this section, (1) the terms mental disease or defect do
not include (A) an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or
otherwise antisocial conduct, or (B) pathological or compulsive
gambling, and (2) "gender identity or expression" means gender identity
or expression, as defined in section [53a-181i] 1-1n.
Sec. 43. Section 53a-16 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
In any prosecution for an offense, justification, as defined in sections
53a-17 to 53a-23, inclusive, shall be a defense. Justification as a defense
does not include provocation that resulted solely from the discovery of,
knowledge about or potential disclosure of the victim's actual or
perceived sex, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression,
including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted,
nonforcible, romantic or sexual advance toward the defendant, or if the
defendant and victim dated or had a romantic relationship. As used in
this section, "gender identity or expression" means gender identity or
expression, as defined in section [53a-181i] 1-1n.
Sec. 44. Subsection (a) of section 53a-30 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) When imposing sentence of probation or conditional discharge,
the court may, as a condition of the sentence, order that the defendant:
(1) Work faithfully at a suitable employment or faithfully pursue a
course of study or of vocational training that will equip the defendant
for suitable employment; (2) undergo medical or psychiatric treatment
and remain in a specified institution, when required for that purpose;
(3) support the defendant's dependents and meet other family
obligations; (4) make restitution of the fruits of the defendant's offense
Public Act No. 26-77 39 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
or make restitution, in an amount the defendant can afford to pay or
provide in a suitable manner, for the loss or damage caused thereby. The
court or the Court Support Services Division, if authorized by the court,
may fix the amount thereof and the manner of performance, and the
victim shall be advised by the court or the Court Support Services
Division that restitution ordered under this section may be enforced
pursuant to section 53a-28a; (5) if a minor, (A) reside with the minor's
parents or in a suitable foster home, (B) attend school, and (C) contribute
to the minor's own support in any home or foster home; (6) post a bond
or other security for the performance of any or all conditions imposed;
(7) refrain from violating any criminal law of the United States, this state
or any other state; (8) if convicted of a misdemeanor or a felony, other
than a capital felony under the provisions of section 53a-54b in effect
prior to April 25, 2012, a class A felony or a violation of section 53a-70b
of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2019, or
section 21a-278, 21a-278a, 53a-55, 53a-56, 53a-56b, 53a-57 or 53a-58 or
any offense for which there is a mandatory minimum sentence which
may not be suspended or reduced by the court, and any sentence of
imprisonment is suspended, participate in an alternate incarceration
program; (9) reside in a residential community center or halfway house
approved by the Commissioner of Correction, and contribute to the cost
incident to such residence; (10) participate in a program of community
service labor in accordance with section 53a-39c; (11) participate in a
program of community service in accordance with section 51-181c; (12)
if convicted of a violation of section 53a-70b of the general statutes,
revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2019, or subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of section 53-21 or section 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, 53a-72a
or 53a-72b, undergo specialized sexual offender treatment; (13) if
convicted of a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor, a
nonviolent sexual offense or a sexually violent offense, as defined in
section 54-250, or of a felony that the court finds was committed for a
sexual purpose, as provided in section 54-254, register such person's
identifying factors, as defined in section 54-250, with the Commissioner
Public Act No. 26-77 40 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
of Emergency Services and Public Protection when required pursuant
to section 54-251, 54-252 or 54-253, as the case may be; (14) be subject to
electronic monitoring, which may include the use of a global positioning
system; (15) if convicted of a violation of section [46a-58] 53-37, as
amended by this act, 53-37a, 53a-181j, as amended by this act, 53a-181k,
as amended by this act, or 53a-181l, as amended by this act, or section 5,
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20 or 21 of this act, participate in
an anti-bias or diversity awareness program or participate in a program
of community service designed to remedy damage caused by the
commission of a [bias] hate crime or otherwise related to the defendant's
violation; (16) if convicted of a violation of section 53-247, undergo
psychiatric or psychological counseling or participate in an animal
cruelty prevention and education program provided such a program
exists and is available to the defendant; or (17) satisfy any other
conditions reasonably related to the defendant's rehabilitation. The
court shall cause a copy of any such order to be delivered to the
defendant and to the probation officer, if any.
Sec. 45. (Effective from passage) (a) The Connecticut Sentencing
Commission established pursuant to section 54-300 of the general
statutes, in consultation with the State-Wide Hate Crimes Advisory
Council established pursuant to section 51-279f of the general statutes,
as amended by this act, shall review the laws of this state concerning
offenses that are hate crimes and the penalties associated with such
offenses. Said commission and council, at a minimum, shall consider the
(1) penalty structure, including the gradation of penalties and degrees
of such offenses, (2) penalties of such offenses when compared with
other offenses under this state's laws that are not hate crimes but
otherwise have substantially similar elements to the elements of those
offenses that are hate crimes, and (3) penalties of such offenses when
compared with penalties of similar hate crimes offenses of other
jurisdictions.
Public Act No. 26-77 41 of 42

Substitute Senate Bill No. 90
(b) As part of said commission's and said council's review, the
commission and council shall determine whether the penalties for this
state's hate crimes are appropriate when reviewed pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section. Not later than January 1,
2027, said commission shall report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, the findings of such review and
recommendations for adjustments to this state's hate crimes penalties, if
any, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-77 42 of 42